Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Powers and Duties.

Sec. 42.40.250.
General powers.

In addition to the exercise of other powers authorized by law, the corporation may

adopt a seal;

adopt bylaws governing the business of the corporation;

sue and be sued;

appoint trustees and agents of the corporation and prescribe their powers and duties;

hire legal counsel to represent the corporation;

make contracts and execute instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of its powers and duties;

acquire by purchase, lease, bequest, devise, gift, exchange, the satisfaction of debts, the foreclosure of mortgages, or otherwise, personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in land, and acquire by appropriation water rights that are located in the state, taking title to the property in the name of the corporation;

hold, maintain, use, operate, improve, lease, exchange, donate, convey, alienate, encumber, or otherwise grant a security interest in, or authorize use or dispose of, land or personal property, subject to other provisions of this chapter;

contract with and accept transfers, gifts, grants, or loans of funds or property from the United States and the state or its political subdivisions, subject to other provisions of federal or state law or municipal ordinances;

undertake and provide for the management, operation, maintenance, use, and control of all of the property of the corporation, including all land and personal property of the Alaska Railroad transferred under 45 U.S.C. 1203(a) and described in the report dated July 14, 1983, as amended, submitted to Congress and the legislature under 45 U.S.C. 1204(a);

recommend to the legislature and the governor any tax, financing, or financial arrangement the corporation considers appropriate for expansion or extension and operation of the Alaska Railroad;

maintain offices and facilities at places it designates;

apply to the state, the United States, and foreign countries or other proper agencies for the permits, licenses, rights-of-way, or approvals necessary to construct, maintain, and operate transportation and related services, and obtain, hold, and reuse the licenses and permits in the same manner as other railroad operators;

prescribe rates to be charged for services provided by the Alaska Railroad consistent with 45 U.S.C. 1201 — 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982);

determine the routes, schedules, and types of service to be provided by the Alaska Railroad;

enter into contracts, leases, and other agreements with connecting carriers, shippers, and other persons concerning the services, activities, operations, property, and facilities of the corporation, including agreements that contain provisions to preserve and expand the railroad’s traffic base;

plan for and undertake expansion of the railroad and railroad activities, including extension of the rail system, and contract with other modes of transportation service connecting to the rail system;

hire and discharge railroad personnel and determine benefits and other terms and conditions of employment;

assume all rights, liabilities, and obligations of the Alaska Railroad in accordance with 45 U.S.C. 1201 — 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982);

maintain a security force to enforce municipal ordinances, state laws, and the corporation’s rules with respect to violations that occur on or to property owned, managed or transported by the corporation;

issue its bonds upon approval of the legislature and provide for and secure their payment, provide for the rights of their holders and hold or dispose of them;

purchase the corporation’s bonds at a price not more than the principal amount of them plus interest;

cancel bonds of the corporation purchased by the corporation;

secure the payment of its bonds by pledge, mortgage, or other lien on its contracts, revenues, income, or property;

consent to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of an installment of principal or interest, or other term of a loan, contract, or agreement to which the corporation is a party;

borrow money, including the amounts necessary to establish reasonable reserves, and pay financing charges and interest on bonds for a reasonable period after which the corporation estimates other money will be available to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, and legal fees, and other expenses necessary or incident to borrowing;

acquire, hold, and dispose of stocks, memberships, contracts, bonds, general or limited partnership interests or other interests in another corporation, association, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, and exercise the powers or rights in connection with these interests that are provided in contracts or agreements and that are allowed by law concerning the satisfaction of debts;

undertake and provide for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, equipping, and operation of connecting, switching, terminal, or other railroads and railroad facilities;

enter into agreements with a state agency or other instrumentality of the state;

do all things necessary or desirable to carry out the powers and duties of the corporation granted or necessarily implied in this chapter or other laws of the state or the laws or regulations of the federal government.

[Renumbered as AS

42.40.560

.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 2003)

Opinions of attorney general. —

While AS

42.40.250

(26) and (30) appear to provide authority for the Alaska Railroad Corporation to purchase locomotives under a secured installment sales agreement, the ARRC is also authorized to implement a procurement process that is “substantially equivalent” to that of AS

36.30.390

. It is not consistent with Alaska’s separation of powers doctrine to extend the legislative approval process to a secured installment sales agreement. Sept. 3, 1999 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.40.260.
Annual report.

Within 90 days following the end of the fiscal year of the Alaska Railroad, the board shall present to the governor a report describing the operations and financial condition of the corporation during the preceding fiscal year. The report may include suggestions for legislation relating to the structure, powers, or duties of the corporation or to the operation or facilities of the corporation. Subject to AS

42.40.220

, the report shall itemize the cost of providing each category of service offered by the railroad and the income generated by each category. The board shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

The annual report must include an analysis of potential sale arrangements whereby the corporation may be transferred into private ownership.

As part of complying with its annual reporting requirements under this section, the board shall file a travel and compensation report with the Department of Administration by January 21 of each year as required by AS

37.05.210

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 1988; am § 82 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1999)

Sec. 42.40.270.
Audits.

The board shall have the financial records of the corporation audited annually by an independent certified public accountant experienced in railroad accounting. The board shall have an annual performance audit conducted by a recognized railroad management expert to assure that the railroad is being managed and operated effectively and efficiently in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and that each appropriation is used to directly support those services for which the appropriation was requested. Auditors shall use the standards required under AS

42.40.100

(9) and determine whether appropriations received for a service that is not self-sustaining were calculated in accordance with United States Surface Transportation Board standards for determining rail service subsidies.

The corporation shall make all of its financial records available to an auditor appointed by the governor and to the legislative audit division for examination. Disclosure to the public by the auditor or legislative audit division of this information is subject to AS

42.40.220

and rules implementing that section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 43 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 42.40.280.
State oversight reports.

The board shall provide a state oversight report to the governor and the legislature before undertaking

expansion, reduction, or diversification of services provided by the railroad upon the date of transfer or as provided under this chapter that the board determines would represent a significant and permanent change in the level and nature of services provided; or

an application for an appropriation to be used for providing any service that is not self-sustaining.

The report under (a) of this section shall be in writing, describe the proposed undertaking in detail, and specify

its financial impact on the corporation;

its impact on the level and nature of services provided by the corporation;

the reasons the action is necessary or desirable to achieve the purposes of this chapter;

whether and when the undertaking or service is expected to be self-sustaining financially; and

if the undertaking requires an appropriation to be used for providing a service that is not self-sustaining, that the amount of the appropriation has been strictly calculated in accordance with United States Surface Transportation Board standards for determining rail service subsidies.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 44 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Sec. 42.40.285.
Legislative approval required.

Unless the legislature approves the action by law, the corporation may not

exchange, donate, sell, or otherwise convey its entire interest in land;

issue bonds;

extend railroad lines; this paragraph does not apply to a spur, industrial, team, switching, or side track;

lease land for a period in excess of 95 years unless the corporation reserves the right to terminate the lease if the land is needed for railroad purposes;

apply for or accept a grant of federal land within a municipality; before approving an action under this paragraph, the legislature must determine that the federal land is required for essential railroad purposes; except as otherwise provided in AS

42.40.410

, this paragraph does not apply to the application for or acceptance of a grant of federal land associated with

the Anchorage-Wasilla line change project on Elmendorf Air Force Base and Fort Richardson;

the Fairbanks intermodal rail yard expansion project;

a conveyance of rail properties of the Alaska Railroad under the original Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982 as set out in Title VI, P.L. 97-468; in this subparagraph, “rail properties of the Alaska Railroad” has the meaning given in 45 U.S.C. 1202(10).

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 2012; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For legislative approval of a lease of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land at Healy for a period in excess of 35 years without reservation of the right of early termination, see sec. 3,
ch. 91, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for legislative approval related to the Delong Dock at Whittier, see
ch. 100, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for legislative approvals of the exchange of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land with Eklutna, Inc., see sec. 1,
ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for the exchange of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land with the United States Department of the Army and the Department of the Air Force, see sec. 2,
ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for the exchange of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land with Chugach Alaska Corporation, see sec. 3,
ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for the exchange of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land with the Municipality of Anchorage and with certain named individuals having adjacent parcels of land, see sec. 4,
ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for legislative intent and authorization giving the Alaska Railroad Corporation permission to engage in land transfers or conveyances affecting Chugach State Park, see secs. 5 — 8,
ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts; for legislative authorization for the issuance of revenue bonds by the Alaska Railroad Corporation under
AS

42.40.250

in a maximum principal amount of $37,000,000 to finance a positive train control rail transportation safety project that qualifies for federal financial participation and associated costs, including, without limitation, reserves for debt service and capitalized interest, if necessary or appropriate, and costs of issuance, and providing the approval required by this section, see § 1,
ch. 8, SLA 2015, in the 2015 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization and approval of bonds that may be issued by the Alaska Railroad Corporation to finance rail transportation projects that qualify for federal financial participation and associated costs, conditions applicable to those bonds, and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval required under this section, see § 1, ch. 28, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of land transfers between the Alaska Railroad Corporation and the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to relocate a portion of the Parks Highway in Wasilla and to allow construction of a heavy aircraft apron and other improvements at the Fairbanks International Airport, see §§ 1 and 2, ch. 11, SLA 2007 in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization and approval of bonds that may be issued by the Alaska Railroad Corporation to finance facilities and equipment relating to a Kenai gasification project involving the transportation by rail and barge of coal, including conditions and limitations applicable to the bonds, termination dates for authorizations of those bonds, and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval required under this section, see §§ 5 and 6, ch. 65, SLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization giving the Alaska Railroad Corporation permission to engage in land transfers or conveyances affecting certain rail land located within the Alaska Railroad Fairbanks Terminal Reserve to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, see § 1, ch. 22, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary & Special Acts.

For legislative authorization giving the Alaska Railroad Corporation permission to engage in land transfers or conveyances affecting certain rail land parcels located within the Alaska Railroad Anchorage Terminal Reserve to the Municipality of Anchorage, declaring the purpose of the transfers or conveyances, and identifying consideration for those transfers or conveyances, see §§ 1 — 3, ch. 52, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the right-of-way along the Eielson Spur Line to the abutting landowners if the state and the Alaska Railroad Corporation have discontinued use of that right-of-way and certain other conditions are met, see § 2, ch. 21, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization for the issuance of revenue bonds by the Alaska Railroad Corporation under AS

42.40.250

in a maximum principal amount of $37,000,000 to finance a positive train control rail transportation safety project that qualifies for federal financial participation and associated costs, including, without limitation, reserves for debt service and capitalized interest, if necessary or appropriate, and costs of issuance, and providing the approval required by this section, see § 1, ch. 8, SLA 2015, in the 2015 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of the exchange of the surface estate of certain Alaska Railroad Corporation land with Eklutna, Inc., see sec. 15, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018, Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Anchorage Reserve rail land to the Municipality of Anchorage, see sec. 16, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Healy Reserve rail land to Usibelli Coal Mine, Inc., see sec. 17, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Fairbanks Terminal Reserve rail land, see sec. 18, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Healy Reserve rail land to Alaska Tourism Development, LLC, see sec. 19, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Anchorage Terminal Reserve rail land to NeighborWorks Alaska, see sec. 20, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Anchorage Terminal Reserve rail land to 1048 Whitney Road, Anchorage, LLC, see sec. 21, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Anchorage Terminal Reserve rail land to 660 Western Drive, Anchorage, LLC, see sec. 22, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the Alaska Railroad Corporation to report to the Resources Committees and Finance Committees of the legislature in 2019, 2020, and 2021 on its activities under this section and the legislative approval provided by secs. 13 - 22, ch. 64, SLA 2018, see sec. 23, ch. 64, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in a portion of the surface estate of the Alaska Railroad Healy Reserve to Alaska Tourism Development, LLC, see sec. 1, ch. 21, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative approval of conveyance by the Alaska Railroad Corporation of its interest in part of the surface estate of Alaska Railroad Corporation land located in Whittier to the Whittier Manor Condominium Association, Inc., see sec. 2, ch. 22, in the 2019 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (5), inserted “except as otherwise provided in AS

42.40.410

,” following “for essential railroad purposes;”.

Sec. 42.40.290.
Long-range capital improvement and program plan.

The corporation shall prepare and the board shall adopt a long-range capital improvement and program plan. The plan must explain the manner in which the corporation intends to accomplish the purposes of this chapter and the corporation’s anticipated capital improvements during each of the five years after the plan is adopted.

The board shall annually review and approve revisions to the long-range capital improvement and program plan. The board shall provide copies of the updated plan to the governor and the legislature by December 1 of each year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.300.
Use of corporation assets.

The corporation shall apply all money, property, other assets, and credit of the corporation toward activities authorized by this chapter.
The corporation may not issue shares of stock, pay dividends, make private distributions of assets, make loans to board members or employees, or engage in business for private benefit.
The use of money, property, another asset, or credit of the corporation for a purpose not authorized by law by a person having the possession or control of it is prohibited.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)

Sec. 42.40.310.
Indemnification.

The corporation may defend and indemnify a current or former member of the board, employee, or agent of the corporation against all costs, expenses, judgments, and liabilities, including attorney’s fees, incurred by or imposed upon that person in connection with a civil or criminal action in which the person is involved by affiliation with the corporation, if the person acted in good faith on behalf of the corporation and within the scope of official duties or powers.

The corporation may purchase insurance to protect and hold personally harmless its employees, agents, and board members from an action, claim, or proceeding arising out of the performance, purported performance, or failure of performance, in good faith, of duties for, or employment with, the corporation and to hold them harmless from expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or monetary judgments from that action, claim, or proceeding. The purchase of insurance is discretionary with the board and insurance is not considered to be compensation to the insured person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 153 SLA 1984)